Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 2 Levy and Replevy of Property Generally

Law reviews.

For comment on Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67,

92 S. Ct. 1983

,

32 L. Ed. 2

d 556 (1972), holding the seizure of property in replevin without notice and hearing or waiver as violative of due process, see 22 J. of Pub. L. 169 (1973).

For note discussing procedures for levy upon an attachment, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

18-3-30.
Duty of officer to whom attachment directed generally and regarding property removed from county.

It shall be the duty of any one of the officers to whom an attachment is directed to levy the attachment upon real or personal property of the defendant which is necessary to satisfy the claim of the plaintiff and which may be found in the county of which he is an officer. It shall be the duty of any one of the officers to whom an attachment is directed, where the defendant has removed his property beyond the limits of the county in which the attachment is issued and returnable, to follow the property into any county of the state, levy the attachment upon such property of the defendant which is necessary to satisfy the claim of the plaintiff, and return the property to the county in which the attachment is returnable.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 70; Laws 1841, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 87; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 10; Code 1863, § 3206; Code 1868, § 3217; Code 1873, § 3284; Code 1882, § 3284; Civil Code 1895, § 4530; Civil Code 1910, § 5075; Code 1933, § 8-201.

Law reviews.

For article discussing Sniadach v. Family Fin. Corp., 395 U.S. 337,

89 S. Ct. 1820

,

23 L. Ed. 2

d 349 (1969) in relation to former Georgia law on prejudgment garnishment, see 21 Mercer L. Rev. 495 (1970).

For comment on Reeves v. Motor Contract Co., 324 F. Supp. 1011 (N.D. Ga. 1971), see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 369 (1972).

18-3-31.
Levy by officer of attachments in order received; entry of time and date of levy on attachment; levy upon land and attachment entry on docket by clerk.

In all cases it shall be the duty of the officer levying attachments to levy them in the order in which they come into his hands, and it shall be his duty to enter upon the same the year, month, day, and hour on which he made the levy. Where the levy is upon land, the attachment must be entered on the execution or attachment docket by the clerk of the superior court in order to be good against third persons acting in good faith and without actual notice.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 19; Code 1863, § 3208; Code 1868, § 3219; Code 1873, § 3286; Code 1882, § 3286; Ga. L. 1892, p. 58, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4532; Civil Code 1910, § 5077; Code 1933, § 8-203.

History of Section.

The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decision in
Deveney, Hood & Co. v. Burton,

110 Ga. 56

,

35 S.E. 268

(1900).

18-3-32.
Levy on property in a different county.

When the plaintiff in attachment wishes to levy his attachment upon property in a different county from that in which the same is returnable, it shall be the duty of the judge issuing the attachment, upon the request of the plaintiff, his agent, or his attorney at law, to make out a copy or copies of the original attachment, bond, and affidavit and certify the same officially to be true copies. Upon delivery of the copies of the attachment, bond, and affidavit, as directed, to any officer of the county in which the property of the defendant is located, it shall be the duty of the officer forthwith to levy the attachment upon the property of the defendant located in that county and to return the attachment, with his actings and doings entered thereon, to the court to which the original attachment is returnable.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 73; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 10; Code 1863, § 3193; Code 1868, § 3204; Code 1873, § 3270; Code 1882, § 3270; Civil Code 1895, § 4516; Civil Code 1910, § 5061; Code 1933, § 8-210; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1065, § 8.

18-3-33.
Replevy of property by defendant generally upon payment of bond; amount of bond; return of property by officer taking bond; right of plaintiff to entry of judgment upon bond.

When an attachment has been levied upon the property of a defendant, it shall be the duty of the officer levying the attachment to deliver the property levied upon to the defendant upon his giving bond, with good security, payable to the plaintiff in attachment, obligating himself to pay the plaintiff the amount of the judgment and costs that he may recover in the case.

Where the value of the property levied upon, as appraised by the levying officer, is equal to or exceeds the claim of the plaintiff, the bond shall be fixed in an amount equal to the amount claimed to be due. Where the value of the property levied upon, as appraised by the levying officer, is less than the claim of the plaintiff, the bond shall be fixed in an amount equal to twice the value of the property levied upon.

The officer taking the bond shall return the bond with the attachment to the court to which the attachment is returnable, and the plaintiff shall be entitled to entry of judgment against the defendant and his sureties upon the bond for the amount of the judgment and costs entered against the defendant in the case.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 71; Laws 1816, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 74; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 11; Code 1863, § 3232; Code 1868, § 3243; Ga. L. 1872, p. 8, § 1; Code 1873, § 3319; Code 1882, § 3319; Civil Code 1895, § 4567; Civil Code 1910, § 5113; Code 1933, § 8-701.

18-3-34.
Replevy of property of foreign corporation upon payment of bond; return of bond by levying officer; right of plaintiff to entry of judgment on bond.

When an attachment is levied on the property of a foreign corporation, any agent of the corporation may recover the property levied upon by giving a bond, with good security, conditioned to pay the amount of judgment and costs that the plaintiff in attachment may recover in the case. The officer taking the bond shall return the bond with the attachment to the court to which the attachment is made returnable; and the plaintiff shall be entitled to entry of judgment against the corporation and its sureties upon the bond for the amount of the judgment and costs entered against the corporation in the case.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 33; Code 1863, § 3233; Code 1868, § 3244; Code 1873, § 3320; Code 1882, § 3320; Civil Code 1895, § 4568; Civil Code 1910, § 5114; Code 1933, § 8-702.